Tennessee statutes. Title 11 Natural Areas and Recreation
Part 1

General Provisions

11-4-101. Short title.

This chapter shall be known as the “Tennessee Forestry Act.”

Acts 1986, ch. 652, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 11-4-101, concerning the forestry division, was transferred to § 11-4-401 in 1986.

For transfer of the division of forestry and the administration of the Tennessee Forestry Act (ch. 4 of this title) from the department of environment and conservation to the department of agriculture, see Executive Order No. 41 (February 4, 1991).

Acts 1992, ch. 693, § 14 provided that throughout this part former references to “commissioner” or “commissioner of conservation” or “commissioner of environment and conservation” were to be amended to become references to “commissioner of agriculture”; and former references to “department” or “department of conservation” or “department of environment and conservation” were to be amended to become references to “department of agriculture.”

Cross-References. Acquisition of lands by political subdivisions for forestry purposes, title 11, ch. 23.

11-4-102. Purpose.

The general assembly recognizes that the forests of Tennessee are a valuable natural resource that provide significant economic and social benefits to the citizens of the state. It is further recognized that efforts are needed to effectively protect and develop those forests in a manner that assures the perpetuation of long-term public benefits. In response to such needs, the general assembly has created the Tennessee Forestry Act. The purpose of this chapter is to establish a state forestry organization that is responsible for the development and administration of those programs and services that ensure effective protection, management, and reforestation of Tennessee's forests.

Acts 1986, ch. 652, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 11-4-102, concerning the forestry commission, was transferred to § 11-4-201 by Acts 1986, ch. 652.

11-4-103. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Commission” means the state forestry commission;

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of agriculture;

“Department” means the department of agriculture;

“Division” means the division of forestry within the department;

“Forestry” means the professional application of scientific principles in the management and use of forest land;

“Forests” means those lands currently occupied by trees of any size and species which may or may not have commercial value but are capable of providing multiple use benefits;

“Multiple use” means the management and use of forests such that a variety or mix of natural resource benefits are derived from that land. “Multiple use” includes, but is not limited to, a combination of timber production, demonstration, watershed protection, wildlife management, recreation, and aesthetics;

“Protection” means the application of such technology and services as may be necessary to minimize mortality and loss of growth occurring in forests as a result of wild fire, insects, disease, and other causal agents;

“Reforestation” means the artificial or natural regeneration of trees on bare land, eroded sites, or previously forested areas;

“State forester” means the director of the division of forestry;

“State forests” means those lands owned by the state and administered under the jurisdiction of the division, for the purpose of multiple use; and

“Vendor services” are contract services for a fee, provided by division personnel, and includes such assistance as tree planting, site preparation, and timber stand improvement.

Acts 1937, ch. 280, § 5; C. Supp. 1950, § 630.9 (Williams, § 630.10); impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 11; impl. am. Acts 1963, ch. 169, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 11-404; Acts 1984, ch. 978, § 1; 1986, ch. 652, § 4; T.C.A., § 11-4-104.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 11-4-103, concerning the state forester, was transferred to § 11-4-301 by Acts 1986, ch. 652.

Attorney General Opinions. Jurisdiction and Maintenance of County Roads in State Forests. OAG 15-50, 2015 Tenn. AG LEXIS 48 (6/8/15).